Montana, session 2025, SB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Public utility planning for 100% renewable energy resources and
greenhouse gas emissions reduction. (1) On or before May 30, 2026, each public utility as defined in 69-3-
1203 shall develop a plan that outlines options, timelines, and challenges for procuring 100% of the utility's
retail sales of energy in the state from renewable resources. The plan may include options for the use of
hydroelectric resources.
(2) To comply with the state's duty to maintain and improve a clean and healthful environment in
Montana for present and future generations, as mandated in Article IX, section 1, of the Montana constitution,
each public utility shall include in the plan the options, timelines, and challenges for reducing greenhouse gas
emissions.
(3) (a) Each public utility shall submit its plan on or before June 1, 2026, to the energy and
telecommunications interim committee provided for in 5-5-230.
(b) The energy and telecommunications interim committee shall:
(i) review the plans;
(ii) invite public comment on the plans; and
(iii) submit recommendations, if any, to the 70th legislature necessary to address the options,
timelines, and challenges outlined in the plans.

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 294

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 294.1
NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 294